California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
 amusement parks, botanical and zoological facilities, business districts and main street communities, education centers, golf courses, historical sites, museums, religious sites, resorts, ski areas, marinas, “u-pick” farms and orchards, farmers’ markets, and wineries, viticulture areas, and vineyards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 158, Sec. 1.   (AB 1633)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

101.8.

(a) The department may design, place, and maintain, or cause to be designed, placed, and maintained, along state highways, signs to inform motorists of rail transportation services which receive public funding, in whole or in part, unless the sign would result in incurring the penalty specified in subsection (b) of Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(b) These signs may only be placed within the right-of-way of state highways that are parallel or adjacent to
 publicly funded passenger rail routes.

(c) The signs are information structures or information signs as those terms are used in Sections 5203 and 5221 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 272, Sec. 9.   Effective August 2, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

101.9.

(a) The department shall adopt rules and regulations to allow, in rural areas, the placement, on interstate and primary highways near public exits, of guide signs indicating the existence, within one-half mile of that exit, of a fire station which is open 24 hours each day of the year.

(b) Upon the request of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection or a city or county, the department may place and maintain the signs in accordance with the adopted rules and regulations. The department shall bear the costs of placing and maintaining the
 signs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 151, Sec. 1.   Effective June 10, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

101.10.

(a) (1) The department shall design, construct, place, and maintain, or cause to be designed, constructed, placed, and maintained, along state highways, signs that read as follows: “Please Don’t Drink and Drive,” followed by: “In Memory of (victim’s name).” These signs shall be placed upon the state highways in accordance with this section, placement guidelines adopted by the department, and any applicable federal limitations or conditions on highway signage, including location and spacing. Signs may memorialize more
 than one victim. “Victim” for purposes of this section means a person who was killed in a vehicular accident, but does not include a party described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(2) The department shall adopt program guidelines for the application for and placement of signs authorized by this section, including, but not limited to, the sign application and qualification process, the procedure for the dedication of signs, and procedures for the replacement or restoration of any signs that are damaged or stolen.

(b) If the placement at the location of a vehicular accident is safe and practical and the conditions of subdivisions (c) and (d) are met, the department shall place a sign described in subdivision (a) in close proximity to the location where the vehicular accident occurred.

(c) (1) A party to that accident was convicted of any of the following:

(A) Murder of the second degree under Section 187, and the violation was a direct result of driving a vehicle while in violation of Section 23152 or 23153 of the Vehicle Code.

(B) Gross vehicular manslaughter while intoxicated under subdivision (a) of Section 191.5 of the Penal Code.

(C) Vehicular manslaughter under subdivision (b) of Section 191.5 of the Penal Code.

(2) A party to that accident operated a vehicle involved in the vehicular accident in violation of Section 23152 or 23153 of the Vehicle Code, but died in the accident or was not prosecuted because he or she is found mentally incompetent pursuant to Section 1367 of the Penal Code.

(d) (1) Upon the request of an immediate family member of the deceased victim involved in an accident occurring on and after January 1, 1991, and described in subdivision (b), the department shall place a sign in accordance with this section. A person who is not a member of the immediate family may also submit a request to have a sign placed under this section if that person also submits the written consent of an immediate family member. The department shall charge the requesting party a fee to cover the department’s cost in designing, constructing, placing, and maintaining that sign, and the department’s costs in administering this section. The sign shall be posted for seven years from the date of initial placement, or until the date the department determines that the condition of the sign has deteriorated to the point that it is no longer serviceable, whichever date is first.

(2) “Immediate family” means spouse, child, stepchild, brother, stepbrother, sister, stepsister, mother, stepmother, father, or stepfather.

(3) If there is any opposition to the placement of the memorial sign by a member of the immediate family, no sign shall be placed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 747, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

101.11.

(a) The Department of Transportation shall, through the erection of highway signs and appropriate markers, provide recognition of the historical importance of the Byzantine-Latino Quarter in the City of Los Angeles. In order to implement this subdivision, the department shall determine the cost of signs and other appropriate markers, consistent with the signing requirements for the state highway system, showing this special designation, and, upon receiving donations from nonstate sources sufficient to cover the cost, shall erect those signs and
 other appropriate markers at the appropriate locations on Interstate Highway 10.

(b) Local designation efforts and other similar actions may complement this project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 100, Sec. 2.   Effective July 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

101.12.

The department may place and maintain, or cause to be placed and maintained, signs on state highways directing motorists to communities within the geographical boundaries of a city, county, or city and county if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The name of the community is culturally unique and historically significant.

(b) The name of the community has resulted from the influence of a culture over a significant period
 of time.

(c) The general public and media commonly recognize the name of the community.

(d) The community is located within a city, county, or city and county.

(e) Signs are consistent with the signing requirements for the state highway system.

(f) The geographical boundary of the community is within three miles of the state highway exit.

(g) Trailblazing signs are installed on the appropriate streets or roads prior to installation of signs on the state highway.

(h) The city, county, or city and county provides funds from nonstate sources that cover all costs for the Department of Transportation to place and maintain, or
 cause to be placed and maintained, appropriate signs on state highways.

(i) The governing body of the city, county, or city and county in which the community is located adopts a resolution that does the following:

(A) Designates the name of the community that is to be used on directional signs.

(B) Defines the geographical boundaries of the community.

(C) Requests the department to post signs on state highways.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

101.13.

The department shall erect, at appropriate locations on highways in the state highway system, generic directional signs to each Veterans’ Home of California authorized pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1010) or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1100) of Division 5 of the Military and Veterans Code, upon receiving funds from nonstate sources sufficient to cover the cost.

Placement of the signs shall be consistent with criteria for signing to federal or state hospitals as set forth in the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices,
 adopted pursuant to Section 21400 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 654, Sec. 1.   (SB 842)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

101.14.

(a) Prior to June 30, 2016, and subject to federal approval as provided in subdivision (d), the department shall update its internal policies to allow displays of the following types of messages on changeable message signs:

(1) Safety messages.

(2) Transportation-related messages.

(3) Reminders to register to vote, as requested by the Secretary of State,
 not more than two days prior to, and on the last day to, register to vote in a particular statewide
 general election, statewide primary election, or statewide special election conducted pursuant to the Elections Code.

(4) Reminders to vote, as requested by the Secretary of State, as elections approach, not more than two days prior to, and on election day of, a particular statewide
 general election, statewide primary election, or statewide special election conducted pursuant to the Elections Code.

(b) For purposes of this section, “changeable message sign” means any electronic sign on a roadway with a changeable message typically used to alert motorists of traffic conditions, unusual weather conditions, emergencies, or other events.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the requirements of the Emergency Alert System, the Amber Plan under Section 8594 of the Government Code, or the Blue Alert System under Section 8594.5 of the Government Code. The department
 may give priority to other messages, including, but not limited to, the display of emergency alerts, Amber Alerts, Blue Alerts, safety messages, and transportation-related messages, over the messages authorized pursuant to paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (a). 

(d) The department shall not display any information on a changeable message
 sign authorized pursuant to paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (a) unless the United States Department of Transportation, or any of its agencies, has expressly approved the display of that information. If the department is advised by the United States Department of Transportation, or any of its agencies, that the display of information otherwise authorized by paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (a) will result in the reduction of federal aid highway funds to the state pursuant to Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code, that display of information shall not be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 693, Sec. 1.   (AB 400)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

101.15.

Roundabouts shall be included in the list of highway facility types that may be used for memorial or dedication signing as designated in the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, adopted pursuant to Section 21400 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 95, Sec. 1.   (AB 634)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

101.18.

(a) The department shall amend the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices to allow supplemental destination signs for museums that meet all the following:

(1) Have a minimum annual attendance of 50,000 persons, regardless if the museum is in a major metropolitan area, urbanized area, or rural area.

(2) Is within five miles of the highway, regardless if the museum is in a major metropolitan area, urbanized area, or rural area.

(b) The department shall make the amendments required by subdivision (a) in its next edition or revision to the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control
 Devices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 127, Sec. 1.   (AB 1320)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101.19.

(a) The Department of Transportation shall work with the Native American Heritage Commission, the California Advisory Committee on Geographic Names, the Counties of Los Angeles and San Bernardino, and California tribes local to, or historically located along, Route 210, to identify appropriate locations for signs to recognize tribal lands along Route 210 and to name Route 210.

(b) The Department of Transportation shall, through the erection of highway signs and appropriate markers, provide recognition of the historical and cultural importance of the California tribes local to, or historically located in, the Counties of Los Angeles and San Bernardino. The
 department shall erect those signs and other appropriate markers at the appropriate locations on Route 210, as part of the department’s regularly scheduled replacement, modification, and maintenance of highway signs.

(c) The Legislature encourages the Counties of Los Angeles and San Bernardino to adopt resolutions to ensure that all people learn about the approved highway signs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 543, Sec. 2.   (AB 776)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

102.

(a) In the name of the people of the State of California, the department may acquire by eminent domain any property necessary for state highway purposes.

(b) For any property that the department is acquiring by, or under threat of, eminent domain, the department shall, in a timely manner, provide a copy of all appraisals it performed or obtained for the property to the property owner. If any appraisals that are performed or paid for by the department are first provided to the
 property owner, the appraiser shall provide a copy of those appraisals to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 411, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

103.

(a) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Multimodal” means transportation options within a transportation corridor, including, but not limited to, highways, rail lines, pedestrian walkways and bike lanes, and commuter transit services.

(2) “North coast corridor project” means a 27-mile long series of projects within the coastal zone that includes improvements to a segment of State Highway Route 5 and the portion of the Los Angeles-San Diego-San Luis Obispo rail corridor between the City of Oceanside and the City of San Diego in San Diego County.

 (3) “8+4 Buffer Alternative” means the addition of a multimodal managed lane facility consisting of two lanes on either side of State Highway Route 5 within the north coast corridor, separated from general purpose lanes by striping or other approved traffic control devices, and which, to the maximum extent feasible, is built within existing rights-of-way owned by the department. The managed lanes would give priority to high-occupancy vehicles, vanpools, and one or more bus rapid transit routes. Value pricing techniques would allow single-occupant vehicles to use the facility by paying a toll, as long as single-occupant vehicle use does not negatively impact the transit uses of the managed lanes.

 (4) “Public works plan” means a plan as described in Section 30605 of the Public Resources Code. A public works plan allows for an integrated regulatory review by the California Coastal Commission rather than a project-by-project approval
 approach, but does not change or abridge any of the California Coastal Commission’s existing authorities, including, but not limited to, federal consistency review authorities under the federal Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1451 et seq.). The public works plan allows for an expedited process that describes, evaluates, and provides mitigation measures for coastal access, highway, transit, multimodal and community enhancement, and environmental mitigation projects within the north coast corridor.

(b) A public works plan approved for the north coast corridor project within the coastal zone shall include all of the elements of the north coast corridor project to be carried out by the department or the San Diego Association of Governments (SANDAG), including coastal access, highway, transit, multimodal, community enhancement, and environmental restoration, and mitigation projects. Once the public works plan for the north coast
 corridor has been approved and certified by the California Coastal Commission, subsequent review by the California Coastal Commission of a notice of intent to develop for a specific project in the public works plan shall be limited to imposing conditions to ensure consistency of the project with the public works plan. The public works plan shall satisfy all of the following:

(1) Identify the California Coastal Commission’s area of original jurisdiction and provide a process for obtaining coastal development permits from the California Coastal Commission directly in those areas.

(2) Contain, but not be limited to, the following elements: the type, size, intensity, and location of all development included in the north coast corridor project; the maximum and minimum size of facilities proposed to be constructed; the standards to which the projects should conform; the thresholds for
 when amendments to the public works plan may be required; and a proposed timetable and phasing program for all projects.

(3) Establish the mitigation measures that the department and SANDAG will be required to undertake prior to construction of each phase. The mitigation measures shall be described with sufficient detail to allow the department and SANDAG to accurately estimate the cost and effort associated with each particular measure and avoid the need for an amendment to the public works plan unless a project is inconsistent with the project description in the approved public works plan.

(4) Establish the process by which project design and mitigation measures included in the public works plan, and the California Coastal Commission’s findings regarding those measures, may be applied to subsequent coastal development permit approvals and other approvals or determinations for
 subsequent phases of the project.

(c) For all elements of the north coast corridor project that are located, entirely or in part, in the coastal zone, as defined by Sections 30103 and 66610 of the Public Resources Code, the department and SANDAG shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) Collaborate with all stakeholders, including local agencies through which the proposed project traverses, the California Coastal Commission, and other affected local, state, and federal agencies to ensure that multimodal transportation options are evaluated and included in the public works plan and, where appropriate, in the project design.

(2) SANDAG shall establish a safe routes to transit program that integrates the adopted regional bike plan with transit services.

(3) SANDAG shall recommend that the department select an alternative no larger than the 8+4 Buffer Alternative as the preferred alternative for the State Highway Route 5 north coast corridor after it makes a finding that it is consistent with TransNet as approved by voters in 2004. The determination of the preferred alternative shall be made by the department and the Federal Highway Administration in their environmental impact report or environmental impact statement, and SANDAG shall include the preferred alternative in its next update to the regional transportation plan.

(4) In order to reduce environmental impacts to the coastal lagoons, both rail and highway bridges crossing each lagoon shall be planned and constructed concurrently, unless construction in phases will result in an environmentally superior alternative to concurrent construction. SANDAG and the department shall ensure that bridges are constructed to their ultimate
 width and length so that construction impacts to each lagoon are minimized.

(5) The public works plan shall evaluate the traffic impacts of the proposed capacity-increasing highway project on city and county streets and roads within the coastal zone, and the department shall consult with the affected local jurisdictions regarding those impacts and include the results of the consultations within the public works plan.

(6) Environmental consequences of the proposed north coast corridor project shall be monitored to ensure that the benefits from mitigation, as described in the permits issued for the individual projects, are being achieved.

(7) Construction of all or a portion of the capacity-increasing project on State Highway Route 5 shall move forward concurrently with multimodal projects and environmental mitigation
 and enhancement projects within each phase, as specified in the public works plan. The phasing plan shall include criteria specified by the California Coastal Commission within the public works plan that shall be met before the next phase of development can occur, and each phase shall include a balance of transit and highway improvements. Although the department and SANDAG shall endeavor to maintain a balance of transit, rail, highway, and environmental improvements in each phase, nothing in this section is intended to limit the ability of the department or SANDAG to seek a public works plan amendment from the California Coastal Commission in order to accelerate a project from a later phase in the public works plan if additional funding is identified to carry out the project at an earlier stage than originally intended.

(8) Prior to a public works plan being submitted to the California Coastal Commission by the department and SANDAG, the
 department and SANDAG shall provide at least two public hearings on the public works plan for the north coast corridor project.

(9) SANDAG has agreed that it will be responsible for constructing improvements in the Los Angeles-San Diego-San Luis Obispo rail corridor and funding portions of the improvements to that corridor and State Highway Route 5 within the north coast corridor using funding from a San Diego County voter-approved transaction and use tax ordinance known as TransNet. Pursuant to that agreement, SANDAG shall commit to dedicate a portion of the TransNet Regional Habitat Conservation Fund for regional habitat acquisition, management, and monitoring activities necessary to implement habitat conservation plans based on the estimated economic benefits derived from permitting and approval efficiencies on the north coast corridor project as a result of the procedures of this section, with that funding to be released by SANDAG in phases
 based upon the proportion of project work that has been issued permits, consistency reviews, or other applicable approvals, and in accordance with any other criteria as deemed appropriate by SANDAG taking into account the purpose and intent of TransNet.

(d) The California Coastal Commission, the department, and SANDAG shall work cooperatively toward completing all design approvals, reviews, determinations, and permitting for the north coast corridor project on an expedited basis. To meet the goals in this section, the following provisions shall apply:

(1) The Legislature finds that it is the California Coastal Commission’s role to apply a regional or statewide perspective to land use debates where the use in question is of greater than local significance. To that end, the California Coastal Commission is authorized to utilize Section 30515 of the Public Resources Code for the
 north coast corridor project and the process referenced in that section may be streamlined pursuant to agreement between the California Coastal Commission and those jurisdictions with an approved local coastal program.

(2) The department and SANDAG shall perform work and complete development consistent with the phasing program adopted in the public works plan pursuant to subdivision (b) unless changes are reviewed and approved by the California Coastal Commission.

(3) A public works plan prepared for the north coast corridor project by the department and SANDAG shall be treated as a long-range development plan to which the provisions in Sections 21080.5 and 21080.9 of the Public Resources Code shall apply.

(4) A permitting agency’s decision to review and approve a public works plan, a plan amendment, or related
 notice of impending development, make a consistency determination, or issue a permit for the north coast corridor project shall be reviewed under the substantial evidence standard.

(5) The Legislature finds that the California Coastal Commission, the department, and SANDAG have agreed that, following approval of the public works plan, the California Coastal Commission shall limit its subsequent regulatory review of the rail aspects of the north coast corridor project to federal consistency.

(e) A notice of determination issued pursuant to Section 21108 or 21152 of the Public Resources Code after January 1, 2011, but prior to January 1, 2012, for a project subject to this section shall be suspended by the department until it is determined that the project’s environmental documents are consistent with the provisions of this section.

(f) (1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede, or in any way alter or lessen the effect or application of, the California Coastal Act of 1976 (Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000) of the Public Resources Code).

(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to narrow the authority of the California Coastal Commission, at any stage of the approval or review process, to resolve policy conflicts pursuant to Section 30200 of the Public Resources Code.

(3) Nothing in this section is intended to apply to any program, project, or other activity that is not related to the north coast corridor project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 535, Sec. 2.   (SB 468)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

103.5.

Subject to Sections 1240.670, 1240.680, and 1240.690 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the real property which the department may acquire by eminent domain, or otherwise, includes any property dedicated to park purposes, however it may have been dedicated, when the commission has determined by resolution that such property is necessary for state highway purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1239.)
-------------------------------------------

103.65.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department should have a reasonable opportunity to acquire properties needed for transportation projects.

(b) Whenever the department determines that a specific parcel of private property will or may be required for the right-of-way of a state highway transportation corridor within seven years, or is located within a corridor which is the subject of a special study, the department shall so notify the planning department of the city or county in which the parcel is located. When reviewing proposals for the development of a
 parcel so identified, the city or county shall review with the department the status of the proposed transportation project involving that parcel.

(c) As used in this section, “special study” means a highway study approved by the commission or the department on or before July 1, 1989, or a study approved after that date conducted pursuant to Section 14530.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 744, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

104.

The department may acquire, either in fee or in any lesser estate or interest, any real property that it considers necessary for state highway purposes. Real property for these purposes includes, but is not limited to, real property considered necessary for any of the following purposes:

(a) For rights-of-way, including those necessary for state highways within cities.

(b) For purposes of exchanging the same for other real property to be used for rights-of-way.

(c) For rock quarries, gravel pits, or sand or earth borrow pits.

(d) For offices, shops, or storage yards.

(e) For parks adjoining or near a state highway.

(f) For the culture and support of trees that benefit a state highway by aiding in the maintenance and preservation of the roadbed, or that aid in the maintenance of the attractiveness of the scenic beauties of a state highway.

(g) For drainage in connection with a state highway.

(h) For the maintenance of an unobstructed view of any portion of a state highway so as to promote the safety of the traveling public.

(i) For the construction and maintenance of stock trails.

(j) For the construction and maintenance of nonmotorized transportation facilities, as defined in Section 887.

(k) (1) (A) For environmental mitigation property, which the department may transfer to, purchase for transfer to, or purchase in the name of a, governmental entity, special district, nonprofit organization, for-profit entity, person, or other entity in accordance with Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 65965) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code, as applicable.

(B) Where feasible, a governmental entity holding property pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall have the
 principal responsibility for natural resource protection or conservation. A governmental entity holding property pursuant to this section shall be approved through the due diligence process set forth in Section 65967 of the Government Code.

(2) For purposes of this section, “environmental mitigation property” means property that is required by state or federal law, or by permit conditions imposed by a state or federal agency, to be preserved or restored and maintained as natural habitat to offset the environmental impacts caused by the construction and operation of a state highway improvement project or for advance mitigation purposes as provided in Section 800.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 57, Sec. 2.   (SB 145)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

104.1.

(a) (1) For purposes of environmental mitigation pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 104, the department may create an endowment or enter one or more agreements with the transferee of an environmental mitigation property or another party or parties to provide funding for the establishment, preservation, restoration, and maintenance of the property consistent with any permit conditions, mitigation requirements imposed by state or federal law, conditions imposed by a state or federal agency, or advance mitigation requirements. This authority includes, but is not limited to, the requirements of Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 65965) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code, as applicable.

(2) Where feasible, a
 governmental entity holding property pursuant to paragraph (1) shall have the principal responsibility for natural resource protection or conservation. A governmental entity holding property pursuant to this section shall be approved through the due diligence process set forth in Section 65967 of the Government Code. For federally imposed mitigation requirements, the department is subject to Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 65965) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code, as applicable, to the extent not in conflict with federal law or regulation.

(b) (1) This section shall remain in effect only until December 31, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.

(2) Endowments or agreements entered into pursuant to this section before December 31, 2033, shall remain in effect beyond that
 date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 57, Sec. 3.   (SB 145)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of December 31, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

104.2.

If property is provided through donation or at less than fair market value to the department for state highway purposes, or purchased with funds provided by a local agency, the donor or seller may reserve the right to develop the property, but any development of the property shall be subject to the approval of the department and any reservations, restrictions, or conditions that it determines necessary for highway safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1081, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

104.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Federal Reconnecting Communities Pilot Program” means the Reconnecting Communities Pilot Program established pursuant to Section 11509 of the federal Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act (Public Law 117-58).

(2) “Joint powers authority” means a joint exercise of powers authority established pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(3) “Program” means the Reconnecting Communities: Highways to
 Boulevards
 Pilot Program established pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) The Reconnecting Communities: Highways to Boulevards Pilot Program is hereby established, to be administered by the department, with guidance from the Transportation Agency, and in consultation with the commission, the Department of Housing and Community Development, the Strategic Growth Council, and the Governor’s Office of Planning and Research, to provide funding, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purpose of awarding competitive grants to eligible entities, in partnership with the department, for planning or implementing the conversion or transformation of underutilized state highways into multimodal corridors that serve residents of underserved communities.

(c) The purpose of the program is to achieve the following goals:

(1) Restore community connectivity through the removal, retrofit, mitigation, or replacement of eligible transportation infrastructure facilities that create barriers to mobility, access, or economic development.

(2) Provide matching funding for potential federal grant funds.

(3) Advance health and equity outcomes for underserved communities by removing health, safety, and access barriers associated with transportation infrastructure within communities.

(4) Improve access to opportunity by improving travel options and reducing combined household transportation and housing costs for underserved communities.

(5) Create opportunities for implementation of affordable housing and affirmatively furthering fair housing.

(6) Avoid or minimize direct and indirect displacement effects from project implementation.

(7) Advance community-based or community-driven transportation planning.

(d) The program shall set aside
 up to 25 percent of available funding for planning and the remainder for implementation.

(e) Eligible applicants under the program may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) For planning grants, a nonprofit organization, a community-based organization, a faith-based organization, a coalition or association of nonprofit organizations, a local agency, a regional agency, a joint powers authority, a tribal government, or a transit agency.

(2) For implementation grants, a local, regional, or state transportation agency, a joint powers authority, or a tribal
 government.

(f) Eligible project types under the program for implementation grants include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Conversion or capping of an access-controlled state-operated transportation route to increase access for bicycles, pedestrians, and transit.

(2) Conversion of a state highway serving as a main street into a multimodal surface street that allows for bicycle, pedestrian, and transit access.

(3) A project that significantly enhances multimodal connectivity along or across a state highway without conversion or capping.

(4) Implementation of early action implementation plans developed under subdivision (g).

(5) Other implementation activities authorized for funding under the federal Reconnecting Communities Pilot Program.

(g) Eligible project types under the program for planning grants include, but are not limited to, the following activities leading to any of the eligible implementation project types:

(1) Community engagement, consultation, and leadership activities.

(2) Planning studies, needs assessments, feasibility studies, scenario planning, conceptual designs, and other planning products.

(3) Project plans and design documents needed to deliver implementation projects.

(4) Environmental review, consultation, or other efforts
 required under any state and federal environmental laws relating to the review or approval of an eligible project.

(5) Early action implementation plans for interim design solutions that demonstrate proof of concept for projects.

(6) Establishment of a community land trust for the development and use of excess or surplus land created by the removal, retrofit, or transformation of an underutilized highway.

(7) Other transportation and community-based transportation planning activities required to advance a specific project.

(8) Other planning activities authorized for funding under the federal Reconnecting Communities Pilot Program.

(h) (1) Within one year of June 30, 2022, the department shall develop guidelines, including project selection criteria, program evaluation metrics, and targeted technical assistance strategies to implement the program. The guidelines shall be exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(2) In developing guidelines pursuant to this section, the department shall solicit input from local communities.

(3) The guidelines shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) (i) A requirement that 100 percent of the program funds are awarded to projects that
 benefit underserved communities. For purposes of the program, the department shall establish a data-driven definition for underserved communities that may include, but need not be limited to, disadvantaged communities, as identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code, and low-income communities, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 39713 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ii) A project eligible under the program shall clearly demonstrate a direct and meaningful benefit to an underserved community, and be adjacent to, or directly located in, an underserved community.

(iii) A project eligible under the program shall require that the applicant demonstrate that the project is developed in partnership with the department and that it would be consistent with the requirements of the federal Reconnecting Communities Pilot Program, regardless of the
 availability of funding from the federal program.

(B) Project selection criteria that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(i) The ability of the project to successfully compete for federal grant funding.

(ii) The demonstrated need of the applicant to address the goals of the program as described in subdivision (c).

(iii) The demonstrated leadership and involvement from local community members and organizations in the creation of the project, or the anticipated leadership or involvement from local community members and organizations in the planning process for which funds are being requested.

(iv) The demonstrated commitment of local, regional, or federal funds as
 leveraged match to state grants.

(v) In awarding planning grants, the prioritization of applications that demonstrate multistakeholder partnerships with local and regional agencies, community-based organizations, and other stakeholders, as appropriate.

(C) Development of performance metrics to measure project outcomes in order to inform future implementation of the program.
